Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department must develop and maintain a publicly available map that indicates all locations where temporary political campaign signs are permitted to be placed along any main-traveled way of the interstate system, primary system, or scenic system across the state. The map must include:(a) All department-owned or managed land;(b) All locations where signs are prohibited because of a state highway right-of-way;(c) Any adjoining private or public land where signs are not prohibited due to proximity to an interstate system, primary system, scenic system, or state highway right-of-way; and(d) Any department-owned or managed land where signs are permitted.(2) The map must be available on the department website and prominently placed for public access.(3) The department may not remove any sign unless the map indicates that the sign is placed in a prohibited area.--- END ---